Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-207
Members; compensation.

When called into the active service of the state, such forces shall receive pay, allowances, and benefits at the same rates prescribed by law for members of the National Guard. While in training at home station or engaged in other inactive service, such forces shall receive no compensation from the state.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 3, p. 448;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-403;

Laws 1943, c. 126, § 3, p. 428;

R.S.1943, § 55-207;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 35, p. 607;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-207;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 81, p. 1607.